New Jersey, session 222, S1919.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    R.S.53:1-9 is amended to read as follows: R.S.53:1-9.  No person shall be appointed a member of the State Police unless he shall be a citizen of the United States between the ages of 21 and 35 years, preferably a resident of this State, of good health and good moral character.  The maximum age of 35 years shall be extended by one year for each year of active duty military service in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, not to exceed a total of six years. No one shall be appointed who has not applied for and taken an examination conducted by the Division of State Police, and established to the satisfaction of the superintendent, evidence of his mental and physical fitness and ability to perform the duties of a member of the State Police. Preference in appointment shall be provided to all qualified applicants who are veterans, as defined in N.J.S.11A:5-1.         The superintendent shall, with the approval of the Governor, arrange for the examination and enlistment of applicants. (cf:  P.L.2014, c.51, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.